Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 7 Livestock Dealers

4-7-1.
License required.

No person, firm or corporation, wherever located, who, in the judgment of the director of environmental management, is primarily engaged in the business of buying, selling or exchanging livestock within the state shall engage in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging livestock within the state, except for slaughter within seventy-two (72) hours, without first obtaining a license from the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 900, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-7-1

; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-2.
Rules and regulations — Terms of licenses — License and renewal fees.

The director of environmental management may make rules and regulations governing animal care, the issuance of licenses and the carrying out of the licensed business and relative to the maintenance of premises, buildings and conveyances, the health rating of livestock intended for sale, and the method and time of inspection and checking of those animals. Each license shall expire on the thirtieth (30th) day of June of each year. The fee for every license or renewal is one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 900, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-7-2

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 4; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-3.
Revocation or suspension of license.

The director may revoke or suspend any license granted by him or her, if in his or her judgment the licensee is not complying with the rules and regulations made, provided, however, that the director shall not revoke or suspend a license until he or she shall have given the licensee five days’ notice in writing of his or her intention to do so. After any suspension or revocation of a license, the licensee has the opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 26; P.L. 1940, ch. 900, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-7-3

.

4-7-4.
Dealing without license.

Any person, firm or corporation engaged in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging livestock, except for slaughter within seventy-two (72) hours, without a license shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 27; P.L. 1940, ch. 900, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-7-4

; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-5.
Compliance with importation regulations.

Every dealer of livestock is required to comply with existing rules and regulations governing the importation of livestock into the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 39; P.L. 1953, ch. 3145, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-7-5

; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-6.
Definitions.

As used in §§

4-7-6

—

4-7-23

:

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Farmers’ co-operative” means a nonprofit association of producers organized with or without capital stock for the purpose of producing and/or selling food commodities.

“License” means the certificate issued by the director to any person, firm, partnership, or corporation regularly engaged in the business of buying, selling and/or transporting livestock to be sold or used for food.

“Livestock” means any bovine, equine, caprine, ovine, camelids, swine or other animal sold for any purpose.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-7.
Director to supervise movement of livestock.

It is the duty of the director of the department of environmental management to supervise the movement of livestock from place to place within the state.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-8.
Application for license.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation, regularly engaged in the business of buying, selling and/or transporting livestock to be sold or used for any purpose, shall annually apply to the director for a license to buy, sell and/or transport livestock to be sold or used for any purpose. The application for that license shall be made upon a form prescribed by the director who may, if he or she is satisfied as to the responsibility and character of the application, issue a license to the applicant to buy, sell and/or transport livestock.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-9 — 4-7-12.
Repealed.

4-7-13.
Revocation of license — Hearing.

Each license provided for in §

4-7-8

shall be issued annually and may be revoked by the director for cause. If in the judgment of the director any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation made under these sections has been violated, the director shall send notice by registered mail to the licensee who shall be given a hearing and if violation is proven his or her license shall be revoked.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-14.
Vehicle number plates.

The director shall furnish for each vehicle to be used by a licensee in the business of buying, selling, and/or transporting livestock, two (2) number plates. These plates shall be displayed prominently on the vehicle used in the buying, selling and/or transporting of livestock under this chapter.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 5; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-15.
Display of license.

Any person operating a vehicle used in the business of buying, selling, and/or transporting live livestock shall deposit or display in the vehicle in some easily accessible place a license to engage in that business as provided by §

4-7-8

.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 6; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-16.
License plate fees.

The fee for the first license issued to any one individual or corporation in accordance with this chapter is fifty dollars ($50.00), which entitles the licensee to one set of number plates. The fee for each additional license and set of number plates is twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-17.
Bill of sale required.

No person shall transport livestock in connection with the sale of the livestock from place to place upon any public highway or road in this state unless he or she has in his or her possession a bill of sale signed by the vendor or agent of the vendor and containing the vendor’s address, the date of transaction, number of livestock, and/or weight, breed and price of livestock and such other information as in the discretion of the director will describe the livestock and establish the proper ownership. The information shall be available at any time to the director or his or her authorized agent or agents.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 8; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-18.
Exceptions from provisions.

This chapter shall not apply to a merchant or a producer of livestock who does not go from place to place buying, selling, and/or transporting livestock nor shall it apply to a farmers’ cooperative transporting livestock in connection with the operation of a cooperative.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 9; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-19.
Administration — Rules and regulations.

The director has authority to administer the provisions of this chapter. He or she shall make and may modify rules and regulations necessary or incidental to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 10; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-20.
Enforcement.

It is the duty of the director to enforce the provisions of this chapter and to prosecute any and all persons who, in his or her opinion, are guilty of violating any of the provisions of those sections, and the director or his or her duly appointed agent or agents are not required to enter into recognizance or become liable for costs.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 11; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 12; Repealed by P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 3, effective July 7, 2004.

4-7-22.
Treble damages in civil action by producer — Alternative remedy.

Any person failing to pay for livestock purchased from the livestock producer, and who is or should be licensed under this chapter, is liable for damages three (3) times the amount unpaid plus reasonable attorney fees as liquidated damages in a civil suit brought by the livestock dealer under the applicable rules of law in the courts. This provision is an additional or alternative remedy to the livestock producer.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 13; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.

4-7-23.
Penalty for violations.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be punished for the first offense by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) and for any subsequent offense by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by revocation of license for not more than one year.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 47, § 14; P.L. 2004, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 468, § 2.